Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2676.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 8-249, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-249. Restoration of the right to possess or carry a firearm; persons adjudicated delinquent A. A person who was adjudicated delinquent and whose period of probation has been completed may have the right to possess or carry a firearm restored by the superior court in the county where the person was adjudicated at the end of the person's term of probation. B. A person who was adjudicated delinquent and who has been discharged from probation, on proper application, may have the right to carry or possess a firearm restored by the judge of the juvenile court in the county where the person was adjudicated delinquent or the judge's successors.  The clerk of the superior court shall process the application on the request of the person involved or the person's attorney. The clerk of the superior court shall serve a copy of the application on the county attorney.  The clerk of the superior court may not charge a filing fee for the application. C. If the person's adjudication was for a dangerous offense under section 13-704, a serious offense as defined in section 13-706, burglary in the first degree, burglary in the second degree or arson, the person may not file for the restoration of the right to possess or carry a firearm until the person attains thirty twenty-five years of age. If the person's adjudication was for any other felony offense, the person may not file for the restoration of the right to possess or carry a firearm for two years from the date of the person's discharge until the person does any of the following: 1. Completes any court-ordered conditions. 2. Completes the person's term of probation. 3. Is discharged from the department of juvenile corrections. END_STATUTE